District of Columbia statutes.
2-1402.62

Aiding or abetting.

It shall be an unlawful discriminatory practice for any person to aid, abet, invite, compel, or coerce the doing of any of the acts forbidden under the provisions of this chapter or to attempt to do so.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title II, § 262, 24 DCR 6038
1981 Ed., § 1-2526.
1973 Ed., § 6-2272.